New York, session 2025-2026, S7855.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known as the "New York AANHPI Education 2 Equity Act". 3 § 2. (a) The commissioner of education is authorized and directed to 4 conduct a survey regarding instruction on Asian American, Native Hawaii- 5 ans and Pacific Islander (AANHPI) history within the state. Such survey 6 shall focus on identifying the extent to which school districts provide 7 instruction on Asian American, Native Hawaiians and Pacific Islander 8 (AANHPI) history. Such survey shall include as appropriate, questions 9 on how the district is providing such instruction, including, but not 10 limited to, the following: 11 (1) how the department's learning standards inform the school 12 district's teaching of AANHPI history; 13 (2) which grade levels are being taught about AANHPI history; 14 (3) how much instructional time is devoted to AANHPI history; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11851-14-5 S. 7855--E 2 1 (4) what are the school district's social studies curricula that are 2 used in the district, and who publishes curricula; 3 (5) what challenges and/or barriers do districts face in incorporating 4 AANHPI history into the curriculum; 5 (6) do educators receive any training or professional development 6 regarding AANHPI history; and 7 (7) are there assessments or evaluations to measure student under- 8 standing of AANHPI history. 9 (b) Findings shall include detailed results of the survey, and if 10 needed, recommendations to implement or strengthen such instruction. A 11 report of the findings of such survey shall be delivered to the gover- 12 nor, the temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, 13 the minority leader of the senate and the minority leader of the assem- 14 bly the first of January following the effective date of this act or one 15 hundred twenty days after the effective date of this act, whichever is 16 later. 17 § 3. The education law is amended by adding a new section 805 to read 18 as follows: 19 § 805. Asian American, Native Hawaiians and Pacific Islander history 20 advisory committee; appointment; powers and duties. 1. The commissioner 21 shall establish an Asian American, Native Hawaiians and Pacific Islander 22 (AANHPI) history advisory committee. 23 2. (a) The committee shall be comprised of four members, to be 24 appointed as follows: 25 (i) one member appointed by the governor; 26 (ii) one member appointed by the temporary president of the senate; 27 (iii) one member appointed by the speaker of the assembly; and 28 (iv) one member appointed by the commissioner. 29 (b) All members appointed to the committee shall be experts in Asian 30 American, Native Hawaiians and/or Pacific Islander studies and/or have a 31 background in educational instruction and/or educational administration. 32 (c) All members of the committee shall be appointed within ninety days 33 of the effective date of this section. 34 3. Vacancies in the membership of the committee shall be filled in the 35 same manner provided for original appointments. 36 4. The committee shall meet no less than four times per year. 37 5. The committee shall provide recommendations on the following: 38 (a) high-quality K-12 curricular and instructional resources on AANHPI 39 history; and 40 (b) strategies for strengthening and deepening public K-12 education 41 programs in the areas of AANHPI history, including analysis of the 42 survey referenced in section two of the chapter of the laws of two thou- 43 sand twenty-five that added this section. 44 6. The committee shall submit their recommendations to the commission- 45 er no later than two years after the effective date of this section and 46 be disbanded thereafter. 47 7. Committee members shall receive no compensation for their services, 48 but shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the 49 performance of their duties. 50 8. To effectuate the purposes of this section, the committee may 51 request from any department, board, bureau, commission or other agency 52 of the state, and the same are authorized to provide, such cooperation 53 and assistance, services and data as will enable the committee to prop- 54 erly carry out its functions pursuant to this section. 55 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 56 deemed repealed 3 years after such date.